Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1605
Transactions and agreements not to use or deal in commodities or services of competitor; unlawful; when.

It shall be unlawful for any person to lease or sell or contract for sale of goods, wares, merchandise, machinery, supplies, or other commodities, or services, whether patented or unpatented, for use, consumption, enjoyment, or resale, or fix a price charged therefor, or discount from, or rebate upon, such price, on the condition, agreement, or understanding that the lessee or purchaser thereof shall not use or deal in the goods, wares, merchandise, machinery, supplies, or other commodity or services of a competitor of the lessor or seller, when the effect of such lease, sale, or contract for such sale or such condition, agreement, or understanding may be to substantially lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in any line of commerce.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 12.